Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5636XS (4) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2237 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 216.7A Closed captioning required. 1 1. A public accommodation shall enable closed captioning 2 for all television programming and online broadcasts that are 3 provided for viewing by members of the public during hours 4 during which the public accommodation is open to the public 5 unless a member of the public asks that closed captioning be 6 disabled on a specific device. In the event of such a request, 7 closed captioning shall be enabled again once the member of 8 the public who requested that closed captioning be disabled 9 discontinues viewing or leaves the public accommodation. 10 2. A person who violates this section shall be subject to a 11 civil penalty of up to twenty-five dollars for each violation. 12 A civil penalty collected under this section shall be deposited 13 in the general fund of the state. 14